hfst-tools/hfst-lexc/test/divvun-sme/sme-lex.txt
!Distributed under the terms of the GNU General Public License version 2
! or any later version.

! ========================================================================== !
!                     North Sámi morphological analyser                      !
! ========================================================================== !
!
! sme-lex.txt
! The file contains morphological affixes for the nouns, verbs and adjectives
!



Multichar_Symbols

! Tags for POS
 +N +A +Adv +V
 +Pron +CS +CC +Adp +Po +Pr +Interj +Pcle +Num

! Tags for sub-POS
 +Prop +Pers +Dem +Interr +Refl +Recipr +Rel +Indef

! Tags for Inflection
 +Ess +Sg +Du +Pl +Nom +Gen +Acc +Ill +Loc +Com
 +SgCmp +SgNomCmp +SgGenCmp +PlGenCmp +Cmpnd +Cmpnd+ +Guess +ShCmp !testing ShCmp
 +First +Last +None +CmpOnly +SgNomLeft +SgGenLeft +PlGenLeft +SgLeft +AllCmp
 +DefSgGenCmp +DefPlGenCmp +DefCmp
 +PxSg1 +PxSg2 +PxSg3 +PxDu1 +PxDu2 +PxDu3 +PxPl1 +PxPl2 +PxPl3
 +Comp +Superl
 +Attr +Card
 +Ord ! CHECK THIS!! In closed-sme there are +Ord entries without circ. tag
 +Ind +Prs +Prt +Pot +Cond +Imprt
 +Sg1 +Sg2 +Sg3 +Du1 +Du2 +Du3 +Pl1 +Pl2 +Pl3
 +Inf +Ger +ConNeg +ConNegII +Neg +ImprtII +PrsPrc +PrfPrc +Sup +VGen +VAbess
 +Actio +Actor +ABBR +ACR +CLB +PUNCT +LEFT +RIGHT ^GUESSNOUNROOT
 +TV +IV ! Transitivity tags
 +Multi ! Multiword phrase tag

! Question and Focus particles:
 +Qst
 +Foc/naj+Qst
 +Qst+Foc/son
 +Foc/ge
 +Foc/gen
 +Foc/ges
 +Foc/gis
 +Foc/naj
 +Foc/ba
 +Foc/be
 +Foc/hal
 +Foc/han
 +Foc/bat
 +Foc/son

! Tags for derivation:

! Old tags:
! +Der/adda +Der/ahtti +Der/alla +Der/asti +Der/easti +Der/aš +Der/d +Der/eamoš
! +Der/amoš +Der/eapmi +Der/geahtes +Der/gielat !better: +Der/NuA
! +Der/h +Der/heapmi +Der/hudda +Der/huhtti +Der/huvva +Der/halla +Der/j +Der/l
! +Der/laš +Der/las +Der/hat +Der/meahttun +Der/muš +Der/n +Der/š +Der/st
! +Der/stuvva +Der/upmi +Der/supmi +Der/vuohta +Der/goahti
! +Der/lágan +Der/lágán +Der/lágaš +Der/jagáš
! +Dimin +Der/viđá +Der/viđi +Der/veara

! Old tags remaining to be checked for the new +Der123 tags:
!+Der/eaddji  ! XN = +Actor

! Explanation:
! Combinations 1, 2, 3, 12, 23, 13, 123 are ok, all other ones are blocked.
! The suffixes marked as +Der1+Der2 to the right cannot combine with Der2, they
! have already "saturated" their Der2-part.
! Phonotactically, Der1 are initial consonants C, Der2 are VCV, and
! Der2 are of a different kind, more like compounding.
! This whole Der123 business is to prevent back-derivation of
! boahtigoahtijuvvohallat and the like.
! Computationally, this is done as a filter composed on top of sme.save.

! Der#begin
! Derivation position in a derivation row:  Affix and
! 1              2            3             POS type
+Der1          +Der2        +Der3
! Der#1
+Der/t                                   ! NN
+Der/Dimin                               ! NN (was: Der/aš & Der/š)
+Der/laš                                 ! NA
+Der/meahttun                            ! VA
+Der/d                                   ! VV
+Der/h                                   ! VV
+Der/huhtti                              ! VV
+Der/j                                   ! VV
+Der/l                                   ! VV
+Der/st                                  ! VV
+Der/las                                 ! VA * +Der1+Der2 - can only combine with Der3
+Der/heapmi                              ! NA * +Der1+Der2 - can only combine with Der3
+Der/lágan                               ! AA * +Der1+Der2 - can only combine with Der3
+Der/lágán                               ! AA * +Der1+Der2 - can only combine with Der3
+Der/halla                               ! VV * +Der1+Der2 - can only combine with Der3
+Der/huvva                               ! VV * +Der1+Der2 - can only combine with Der3
+Der/stuvva                              ! VV * +Der1+Der2 - can only combine with Der3
! Der#2
              +Actor
              +Der/Dimin                 ! NN
              +Der/eapmi                 ! VN
              +Der/adda                  ! VV
              +Der/ahtti                 ! VV
              +Der/alla                  ! VV
              +Der/asti                  ! VV
              +Der/easti                 ! VV
              +Der/gielat                ! QA
              +Der/jagáš                 ! QA
              +Der/lágaš                 ! QA
              +Der/lágáš                 ! QA ! - check this!
              +Der/lágan                 ! AA ! Check these!
              +Der/lágán                 ! AA ! Check these!
              +Der/PassL                 ! VV - long passive
! Der#3
                           +Der/amoš     ! VN
                           +Der/eamoš    ! VN
                           +Der/geahtes  ! VA
                           +Der/goahti   ! VV
                           +Der/muš      ! VN
                           +Der/supmi    ! VN
                           +Der/n        ! VN
                           +Der/vuohta   ! AN
                           +Der/upmi     ! VN

! Der#other
! Other/unclassified derivations, can appear in all positions:
+Der/veara    ! NA#
+Der/viđá     ! NA#
!+Der/viđi     ! NA# outcommented, since we have the noun vih0ti, gen:viđi

+Der/PassS    ! VV - short passive



! Der#end


! Semantic tags
 +Ani +Mal +Fem +Sur +Plc +Org +Obj
! +WEB

! Triggers for morphophonological rules
 X1 X2 X3 X4 X5 X6 X7 X8 X9 Y1 Y2 Y3 Y4 Y5 Y6 Y7 Y8 Y9
 Q1 Q2 Q3 Q4 Q5 Q6 Q7 Q8 Q9 W1 W2 W3 W4 W5 W6 W7 W8 W9

! Morphophonemes and Sámi letters
 b9 e7 e9 d9 g8 g9 h8 h9 i7 j9 k9 m8 m9 n8 n9 o7 o9 p9
 s9 t9 u7 z9 '7 š9 r9
 B9 E7 E9 D9 G8 G9 H8 H9 I7 J9 K9 M8 M9 N8 N9 O7 O9 P9
 S9 T9 U7 Z9 Š9 R9

! Aspell tags
! /A /B /C /D /E /F /G /H /I /J /K /L /M
! /N /O /P /Q /R /S /T /U /V /W /X /Y /Z

! Flag diacritics
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@  @D.NeedNoun.ON@  @C.NeedNoun@ ! (Dis)allowing compounds

! @P.Need3Part.ON@ @D.Need3Part.ON@ @C.Need3Part@ !3Part

 @U.Cap.Obl@  @U.Cap.Opt@			! Allowing downcasing of
        							! derived names: deatnulaš.
        							! Actually, downcasing should be obligatory

! Testing instruction:
! For testing purposes, the string !^C^ is added to every line that causes
! circularity. In order to use the "check-all" option of lexc (that lists all
! generated forms), the file  should be generated without the lines containing
! the sequence "^C^" This is done by the command "make rec-clean". The resulting
! binary file will be called nonrec-sme.save, and it will be stored in
! sme/int.

! Other similar textual flags include:
! !SUB = substandard forms
! ^P^  = pedagogical, i.e. forms to be removed for the pedagogical speller
! ^NG^ = not-generate, i.e. forms to be deprecated for natural language generation.
! ^N^  = Numerals, are removed with ^C^





! Basic lexica, pointing to the other lexicon files
! =================================================


LEXICON Root
 Prefixes ;				  	! ^C^
 +Cmpnd+:%- NounRoot ;	    ! ^C^
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ProperNoun ;   ! These flags are for
 @U.Cap.Opt@ ProperNoun ;   ! downcasing the propernouns
! AspellProp ;			    ! Only for aspell target !!
 NounRoot ;
! AspellAffix ;			    ! Only for aspell target !!
! ProperNounFirstPart ;	  ! Merged with ProperNoun, but kept as group
 AdjectiveRoot ;
 VerbRoot ;
 Copula ;
 Negativeverb ;
 Adverb ;
 Particles ;
 Subjunction ;
 Conjunction ;
 Adposition ;
 Interjection ;
 Pronoun ;
 Numeral ;			       !  Circular ^N^
 Acronym ;
 Abbreviation ;
 Punctuation ;
 VEARA ;			       ! For a very exceptional adjective.
 Rmiddle ;                 ! gaskbeaivi, this is the "new" R, not Rreal




! Prefixing and compounding
! =========================

LEXICON Prefixes	! ^C^
 ii%- AdjectiveRoot ;        !    ii-biologalaš ^C^
 ii%- NounRoot ;			  !^C^
 Lul^le%- ProperNoun ;        !^C^ Lulli-Trøndelaga etc.
 Lul^li%- ProperNoun ;        !^C^
 Lul^li^nuor^ta%- ProperNoun ; !^C^
 Mát^ta%- ProperNoun ;        !^C^
 Dav^vi%- ProperNoun ;        !^C^
 Dav^ve%- ProperNoun ;        !^C^ 76 i korpus, 17 i leksikon
 Gas^ka%-  ProperNoun ;       !^C^
 Vuol^li%- ProperNoun ;       !^C^
 Vuol^le%- ProperNoun ;       !^C^
 Bad^je%- ProperNoun ;        !^C^
 Oar^je%- ProperNoun ;        !^C^
!Oar^jel%- ProperNoun ;       !^C^ Oarje 38 i korpus hard code oarjelsámi/-sápmelaš - brukes bare dær
 Orj^jel%- ProperNoun ;       !^C^ Orjje 0 i korpus  orjjelsápmi
 Orj^ješ%- ProperNoun ;       !^C^ (vest)
 Mát^ta%- ProperNoun ;        !^C^
 Nuor^ta%- ProperNoun ;       !^C^ (aust)
 Ođ^đa%- ProperNoun ;         !^C^
 eah^pe# NounRoot ;           !^C^
 eah^pe# AdjectiveRoot ;      !^C^
 eah^pe# VerbRoot ;           !^C^

!"<Jus fylkkaboazodoallostivra gávnnaha ahte>"
!"<Ođđa siidaoasi dohkkeheami biehttaleami>"



LEXICON R ! lexicalising the 3-part compounds, with the tag ShCmp while investigating.
                       Rreal ;  ! Business as usual: Normal compounds right on th Rreal
#                      Rmiddle ;

LEXICON Rmiddle
 al+ShCmp:al           Rreal ;  !SUB
 beai+ShCmp:beai       Rreal ;
 beal+ShCmp:beal       Rreal ;
 báldd+ShCmp:báldd     Rreal ;  !SUB
 gabb+ShCmp:gabb	   Rreal ;  !SUB
 garr+ShCmp:garr	   Rreal ;  !SUB
 gask+ShCmp:gask	   Rreal ;  !SUB
 geai+ShCmp:geaj       Rreal ;  !SUB
 geaš+ShCmp:geaš       Rreal ;
 gieh+ShCmp:gieh       Rreal ;  !SUB
 giet+ShCmp:giet       Rreal ;  !SUB
 guodd+ShCmp:guodd     Rreal ;  !SUB
 guoih+ShCmp:guoih     Rreal ;  !SUB
 guoikk+ShCmp:guoikk   Rreal ;  !SUB
 oahpaheai+ShCmp:oahpaheai  Rreal ;
 jot+ShCmp:jot         Rinter ; !SUB
 joh+ShCmp:joh         Rreal ;  !SUB
! #lih+ShCmp:lih	   Rreal ;
 liig+ShCmp:liig	   Rreal ;  !SUB
 miel+ShCmp:miel       Rreal ;
 mies+ShCmp:mies	   Rreal ;  !SUB
 muorr+ShCmp:muorr     Rreal ;  !SUB
! nii+ShCmp:nii        Rreal ;
 niib+ShCmp:niib	   Rreal ;  !SUB
 njun+ShCmp:njun       Rreal ;  !SUB
 njár+ShCmp:njár	   Rreal ;  !SUB
 námm+ShCmp:námm	   Rreal ;  !SUB
 oaiv+ShCmp:oaiv	   Rreal ;  !SUB
 oai+ShCmp:oai 	       Rreal ;  !SUB
 ris+ShCmp:ris	       Rreal ;  !SUB
 sai+ShCmp:sai         Rreal ;  !SUB
 sis+ShCmp:sis         Rreal ;  !SUB
 vuohpp+ShCmp:vuohpp   Rreal ;  !SUB
 vuol+ShCmp:vuol       Rreal ;
 váh+ShCmp:váh         Rreal ;  !SUB
 vár+ShCmp:vár         Rreal ;  !SUB
 vát+ShCmp:vát         Rreal ;  !SUB
 čip+ShCmp:čip	       Rreal ;  !SUB
 čáz+ShCmp:čáz	       Rreal ;  !SUB
 šlubb+ShCmp:šlubb     Rreal ;  !SUB
 sáh+ShCmp:sáh         Rreal ;  !SUB
 sát+ShCmp:sát         Rreal ;  !SUB

LEXICON Rnoun
 Rreal ;
 +N+Attr: # ;   !Kárášjot !SUB
! Intermediate solution. Words pointing here come from
! the upper part of the NounRoot lexicon. They differ
! from inter in that they need a POS tag.

LEXICON Rinter
 Rreal ;
 # ;   !Kárášjot !SUB

LEXICON Rreal ! This is the former R lexicon
     Rreal_nonhyph ;     !^C^
 :%- Rreal_hyph ;

LEXICON Rreal_nonhyph   !^C^
 #                 NounRoot ;           ! This is the normal case.		         ^C^
 #                 NounSecond ;	        ! Testing some quasisuff, cf. noun file  ^C^
 #@P.NeedNoun.ON@  VerbRoot ;           ! Flag diacr declares that the compound  ^C^
 #@P.NeedNoun.ON@  AdjectiveRoot ;      ! needs a +N tag later in the derivation ^C^
